Utah statutes.
72-2-120.   Tollway Restricted Special Revenue Fund -- Revenue --
Nonlapsing.
(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund known as the "Tollway
Restricted Special Revenue Fund."
(2)  The fund shall be funded from the following sources:
(a)  tolls collected by the department under Section 72-6-118;
(b)  funds received by the department through a tollway development agreement
under Section 72-6-203;
(c)  appropriations made to the fund by the Legislature;
(d)  contributions from other public and private sources for deposit into the
fund;
(e)  interest earnings on cash balances; and
(f)  all monies collected for repayments and interest on fund monies.
(3)  All monies appropriated to the fund are nonlapsing.
(4)  The Division of Finance shall create a subaccount for each tollway as
defined in Section 72-6-118.
(5)  The commission may authorize the monies deposited into the fund to be
spent by the department to establish and operate tollways and related
facilities, including design, construction, reconstruction, operation,
maintenance, enforcement, impacts from tollways, and the acquisition of right-
of-way.
